Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.070

Resolution for election.

The legislative body of an incorporated city or town may, by resolution, submit to the voters in the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days after passage of the resolution, or in a special election to be called for that purpose not less than ninety days nor more than one hundred and eighty days after passage of the resolution, a proposal that the city or town adopt the classification of noncharter code city and organize under one of the plans of government authorized in this title, naming such plan.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.070.]